District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2502.45

Severability

Repealed.

April 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 16(c), 44 DCR 140
1981 Ed., §§ 35-1547 to 35-1549.

Former § 35-1547 1981 Ed. was also amended by D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), eff. May 21, 1997. D.C. Law 11-268 amended former § 35-1547 1981 Ed. by substituting “Commissioner” for “Superintendent” in the first sentence.

D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends § 35-1547 1981 Ed. subsequent to repeal.